North Carolina, session 2025, SB923.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of
Winston-Salem for the support of a rural maternal health program at the facility commonly
known as Atrium Health Levine Children's Brenner Children's Hospital.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S923-v-1*